North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 10. Bail. [Repealed]

§§ 15-102,
15-103.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter. For present provisions as to bail, see

G.S. 15A-531

et seq.

§ 15-103.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to bail, see

G.S. 15A-531

et seq.

§ 15-103.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 166, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to Chapter 15A.

§ 15-104.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter.

§ 15-104.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 166, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to Chapter 15A.

§§ 15-105 through 15-107.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter.

§ 15-107.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 166, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to Chapter 15A.

§§ 15-108,
15-109.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter.